California statutes. Harbors and Navigation Code
On or before June 15 of each year, the board shall publish a notice pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code throughout the district stating both of the following:

(a) That the preliminary budget has been adopted and is available at a time and at a place within the district specified in the notice for inspection by interested taxpayers.

(b) That on a specified date not less than one month after the publication of the notice and at a specified time and place, the district board will meet for the purposes of fixing the final budget, and that any taxpayer may appear and be heard regarding the increase, decrease, or omission of any item in the budget or for the inclusion of additional items.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 77.)
-------------------------------------------

6093.2.

At the time and place designated in the published notice for the meeting, any taxpayer may appear and be heard regarding the increase, decrease or omission of any item in the budget or for the inclusion of additional items. The hearing on the budget may be continued from time to time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 905.)
-------------------------------------------

6093.3.

The district board shall report the final budget to the board of supervisors after the budget hearing but not later than the first day of August each year after making any changes in the preliminary budget it deems advisable during or after the hearing, including deductions, increases or additions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 905.)
-------------------------------------------

6093.4.

The board of supervisors shall at the time of levying the county taxes, levy a tax upon all the taxable property within the district sufficient to meet the amounts set forth in the final budget submitted by the district board; provided, that no taxes shall be levied for any capital outlay or capital outlay fund included in the final budget submitted by the district board, if not less than 10 percent of the qualified electors of the district have signed a petition filed with the board of supervisors protesting the levy for any capital outlay or capital outlay fund included in the final budget submitted by the district board, or if a written protest against the proposed capital outlay or capital outlay fund signed by a majority in number of the assessees of real property representing one-half or more of the assessed valuation of the taxable real property within the district, as shown by the last preceding equalized assessment roll, is filed with the board of supervisors, the board of supervisors shall delete said levy for capital outlay or capital outlay fund from the final budget before levying a tax to raise the amount required by the final budget. Such protest petition must be filed with the board of supervisors not later than five days prior to the final day on which the board of supervisors is required by law to make the annual tax levy. The money when collected by the tax collector of the county shall be paid to the treasurer of said district; provided further, that any levy for capital outlay or for capital outlay fund shall not exceed three cents ($0.03) per one hundred dollars ($100) assessed valuation of all the real and personal property in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 540.)
-------------------------------------------

6094.

(a) The district may, in any year, levy assessments, reassessments, or special taxes and issue bonds to finance waterway construction projects and related operations and maintenance, or operations and maintenance projects independent of construction projects in accordance with, and pursuant to, the Improvement Act of 1911 (Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 (Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Benefit Assessment Act of 1982 (Chapter 6.4 (commencing with Section 54703) of the Government Code), the Integrated Financing District Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 53175) of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), the Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982 (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), and the Marks-Roos Local Bond Pooling Act of 1985 (Article 4 (commencing with Section 6584) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(b) Sections 5116, 5117, 5118, 5119, 5190, 5191, 5192, 5193, 10104, and 10302 of the Streets and Highways Code shall not apply to assessment proceedings undertaken pursuant to this section. 

(c) Notwithstanding the related provisions of any assessment act which the district is authorized to use, any assessment diagram which any of those acts requires to be prepared prior to final approval of the assessment district may show only the exterior boundaries of the assessment district and the boundaries of any assessment zones or improvement areas within the district. The diagram may refer to the county assessor’s maps and records for a detailed description of each lot or parcel. 

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the district may levy and collect assessments and reassessments in the same manner as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 51320) of Chapter 2 of Part 7 of Division 15 of the Water Code, to pay any or all of the following: 

(1) For the operation and maintenance of projects, including maintenance of lands, easements, rights-of-way, dredge material disposal areas, and remediation. 

(2) For the satisfaction of liabilities arising from projects.

(3) To accumulate a fund which may be used to advance the cost of district projects, provided that the advances be repaid, with interest as determined by the commissioners, from assessments, reassessments, special taxes, or fees charged by the district pursuant to this section. 

(4) To acquire real property, easements, or rights-of-way for a navigation project or the maintenance of a navigation project. 

(5) To acquire real property within the district for disposal of dredged material. 

(e) For purposes of this section, functions designated by Article 3 (commencing with Section 51320) of Chapter 2 of Part 7 of Division 15 of the Water Code to be performed by the board of supervisors, the board of trustees, or valuation commissioners shall be performed by the district’s board. 

(f) For purposes of this section, the board may order the creation of a separate assessment roll to pay the allowable expenses of any single project or any group or system of projects. 

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all assessments, reassessments, and taxes levied by the district may be collected together with, and not separately from, taxes for county purposes. Any county in which the district is located may collect, at the request of the district, all assessments, reassessments, and special taxes levied by the district and shall cause those revenues to be deposited into the county treasury to the credit of the district. Each county may deduct its reasonable collection and administrative costs. 

(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any assessment or reassessment levied pursuant to this section may be apportioned on the basis of land use category, tonnage shipped on the waterway, size and type of vessel using the waterway, front footage, acreage, capital improvements, or other reasonable basis, separately or in combination, as determined by the district commissioners. 

(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, Division 4 (commencing with Section 2800) of the Streets and Highways Code shall not apply to any assessment levied by the district. 

(j) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no bond issued pursuant to this section shall be used to fund the routine maintenance dredging of channels.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 978, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Claims [6095. - 6095.]

6095.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Revenue Bonds [6100. - 6106.]

6100.

Pursuant to this chapter a district may create a revenue bond indebtedness for the acquisition and construction, or acquisition or construction of any improvements or property or facilities contained within its powers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

6101.

The issuance of said bonds shall be authorized by ordinance adopted by two-thirds of all the members of the board, to take effect upon its publication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

6102.

The secretary shall publish said ordinance once in a newspaper of general circulation printed in said district, and if there is none, then in such newspaper published in the county in which said district is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

6103.

The ordinance shall specify the total amount, denomination, method of maturity, and the rate or maximum rate of interest of the bonds, whether other parity revenue bonds may be issued, and in general terms, the acquisitions and improvements to be constructed thereby; and, in addition, shall contain other and further provisions as in the judgment of the board are deemed advisable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 978, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

6104.

The proceeds of said bonds shall be placed in an account in the treasury of the district to be entitled ____ Harbor District Revenue Construction Fund No. ____, and used exclusively for the objects and purposes mentioned in the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

6105.

(a) The lien of the bonds of the same issue shall be prior and superior to all revenue bonds subsequently issued.

(b) The district shall only issue parity revenue bonds if the district board determines, based on an audit of the district’s finances conducted under generally accepted accounting principles, that both of the following conditions exist:

(1) The district is not in default in the repayment of any prior issuance of its bonds.

(2) The net revenues of the district for the prior fiscal year have amounted to at least 125 percent of the maximum annual debt service in any fiscal year thereafter, including all indebtedness incurred as the result of additional issues of bonds.

(A) For purposes of calculating the net revenues of the district for the prior fiscal year pursuant to this paragraph, the district may include up to 75 percent of the district’s estimated additional annual net revenue to be derived from either of the following:

(i) Any additions, improvements, or extensions to the district’s properties, works, or facilities, or the pro rata portion thereof, which were not in service during the prior fiscal year, and that were, or are to be, made using funds from any source, including, but not limited to, the parity revenue bonds.

(ii) Any increase in the charges made for the district’s services that became effective prior to the authorization of the parity revenue bonds but which were not in effect during the prior fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 770, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

6106.

Proceedings for the issuance of the bonds shall commence, the board shall have those powers and duties, and the bondholders shall have those rights and remedies provided in Sections 54344 to 54346, inclusive, Sections 54347, 54348, 54350, 54351, 54352, and Article 4 (commencing with Section 54400) to Article 11.5 (commencing with Section 54664), inclusive, of Chapter 6 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. As used in those provisions, “resolution” means ordinance, “local agency” means district, and “legislative body” means board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 770, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Annexation [6110. - 6110.]

6110.

There may be annexed to a district any of the following territory which is in the same county as the district, or in any other county:

a. Any territory contiguous to the district.

b. Any territory, any point of which touches the district.

c. Any territory separated from the district by a “separating barrier,” which term includes a street, road, highway, railway line, railway crossing, railway right-of-way, watercourse, lagoon, or other natural barrier.

d. Any territory specified in this section may consist of one or more separate parcels of land, but it is not necessary that all parcels shall constitute in the aggregate one tract of land.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. PORT DISTRICTS [6200. - 6372.]



  General Provisions

6200.

“District,” as used in this part, refers to any port district formed pursuant to this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6201.

“Board,” as used in this part, means the board of port commissioners described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 6240).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

6202.

This part does not repeal, modify or otherwise affect the provisions of any other law relating to port or harbor districts, and no other law providing for the creation of port or harbor districts repeals, modifies or otherwise affects this part or any of its provisions.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6203.

Any property owned by any city which is used or held for the purpose of aiding or developing navigation, commerce or fishing may be transferred to the district to be used for the same purposes, and any lands of the State which may have been transferred to any such city may be transferred to the district subject to the trusts and other provisions for the transfer of the lands from the State to the city. A city which is governed by a freeholders charter may only transfer or turn over property if authorized by the provisions of its charter or an amendment thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6204.

If any land under a navigable stream is by virtue of any work or improvement by the United States or the State, freed from the easement of navigation and fishing, it reverts to the district, to be used for the purposes for which the district was organized. But if any land is not used or held for such purposes, it reverts to the State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6205.

If the district is dissolved, lands which were granted to it by a municipal corporation revert to that municipal corporation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1. Formation [6210. - 6233.]



  ARTICLE 1. Petition and Hearing [6210. - 6218.]

6210.

A district may be organized pursuant to this part. It shall include one municipal corporation and any contiguous unincorporated territory in any one county but a municipal corporation shall not be divided in the formation of a district.

Territory which may be annexed to a municipal corporation, which is in a district, is by virtue of the annexation a part of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6211.

The formation of a district is initiated by a petition presented at a regular meeting of the board of supervisors of the county in which the proposed district is situated.

The petition shall be signed by a number of registered voters, residing within the proposed district, equal to not less than five per cent of the number of registered voters, residing in the district, who voted at the last preceding general State election at which a Governor was elected. The petition may consist of any number of instruments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6212.

The petition shall state the name of the proposed district, and describe the proposed boundaries and it shall pray that the territory included be created a district pursuant to this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6213.

Upon presentation, the petition shall be filed with the clerk of the board of supervisors, and upon filing, or at its next regular meeting, the board of supervisors shall fix a time for hearing it, which shall not be less than thirty nor more than sixty days from the date of filing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6214.

A notice of the time and place of the hearing of the petition, including a copy of the petition, excepting the names thereon, shall be published at least four times in a newspaper of general circulation published in the territory included within the proposed district, and in case no such newspaper is published in the territory, then in a newspaper published in the county in which the proposed district is situated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6215.

At the hearing of the petition, the board of supervisors shall hear those appearing in support, and all protests or objections. The hearing may be adjourned from time to time, not exceeding sixty days in all.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6215.5.

If the board of supervisors finds that protests have been made, prior to its final determination for formation of the district, by the owners of real property within the proposed district the assessed value of which, as shown by the last equalized assessment roll, constitutes more than one-half of the total assessed value of the real property within the proposed district, the proceeding shall terminate. The board of supervisors shall order the proceeding terminated when such protests are received.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 70.)
-------------------------------------------

6216.

The board of supervisors may make such changes in the proposed boundaries of the district as are advisable, and it shall define and establish the boundaries.

If the board of supervisors deems it proper to include any territory not included within the boundaries proposed in the petition, it shall first give notice of its intention so to do, by publication of notice in a newspaper published in the county in which the district is located, for two times. The hearing on a proposed inclusion of additional territory shall not be continued beyond sixty days after the board determines to give notice of its intention to increase the boundaries. Within ten days of the final hearing of the matter, the board of supervisors shall make its order fixing the boundaries of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6217.

The boundaries of any district shall be fixed by the board of supervisors so as not to include more than fifty square miles of unincorporated territory. This area shall have a frontage upon the waterway which it is contemplated will be improved, and the board of supervisors shall only include within the boundaries land which will be benefited by the creation and operation of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6218.

At the time of making its order fixing the boundaries of the district the board of supervisors shall call an election to determine whether the proposed district shall be organized.

A defect in the contents of the petition or in the title to or in the form or publication of the notice shall not vitiate any proceedings thereon, if the petition has a sufficient number of qualified signatures.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Election on Formation [6230. - 6233.]

6230.

An election shall be held within 130 days of the call, to determine whether the district shall be organized. The election shall be conducted in conformity with the general election laws. At the election the proposition shall be placed on the ballot, permitting each voter to vote “yes” or “no.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 67.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6231.

The board of supervisors shall canvass the results of the election and if a majority of those voting have voted “yes” the proposition is carried, and the board of supervisors shall certify the result to the Secretary of State, who shall file it. From and after the filing of the certificate by the Secretary of State, the district is in existence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6232.

A certified copy of the certificate filed with the Secretary of State, shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder in the county in which the district is situated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6233.

Any informality in procedure or in the conduct of the election shall not invalidate the establishment of the district.

Any proceedings in which the validity of its establishment is denied shall be commenced within sixty days after the date of filing in the office of the Secretary of State of the certificate mentioned in this article. Otherwise, the establishment and legal existence of the district and all proceedings in respect thereto are valid in every respect and incontestable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Board of Port Commissioners [6240. - 6276.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administrative Provisions [6240. - 6255.]

6240.

The district shall be governed by a board of port commissioners. The board consists of five members. Two of the commissioners shall be appointed by the board of supervisors of the county in which the district is located. Two of the commissioners shall be appointed by the city council of the municipal corporation situated in the district. The board of supervisors, together with five members of the city council, appointed by the mayor of the municipality in the district constitute a board of election to appoint the other commissioner. This commissioner shall be chairman of the board. A majority vote is necessary for the appointment of the chairman of the board. An auditor shall be appointed by the board of port commissioners and approved by the board of supervisors and the city council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2103.)
-------------------------------------------

6240.3.

(a) The Stockton Port District shall be governed by a board of port commissioners consisting of seven members who shall have the qualifications prescribed by Section 6244. Three of the commissioners shall be appointed by the Board of Supervisors of San Joaquin County and four of the commissioners shall be appointed by the City Council of the City of Stockton.

(b) Commissioners may be removed from office during their term at pleasure by a two-thirds vote of the appointing authority.

(c) The terms of members of the board of port commissioners in office on the effective date of this section shall expire on the succeeding calendar day. Within 10 days thereafter, members of the board of port commissioners shall be appointed in the manner prescribed by subdivision (a). The terms of office of the members of the board of port commissioners shall be four years from the time of appointment, unless removed from office during their term pursuant to subdivision (b), except that the commissioners first appointed shall classify themselves by lot, so that the terms of such initial members shall expire, as follows:

(1) One member January 15, 1975.

(2) Two members January 15, 1976.

(3) Two members January 15, 1977.

(4) Two members January 15, 1978.

(d) At the first meeting of the board of port commissioners, the board shall organize by electing one of its members chairman. The members of the board of port commissioners shall annually elect a chairman. A chairman shall not succeed himself in office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

6240.5.

The Santa Cruz Port District shall be governed by a board of port commissioners consisting of five members, elected by the district at large, each of whom shall be an elector of the district at the time of his or her nomination or appointment and during his or her entire term. The Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code) shall govern all district elections for port commissioners.

All members of the board of port commissioners of the district shall be elected at the general district election to be held in 1979 and shall take office as provided in the Uniform District Election Law. The district shall continue to be governed by a board of port commissioners appointed in accordance with this chapter until succeeded by the board of port commissioners elected at such general district election at noon on the last Friday in November next following the election. The term of office of each commissioner is four years, and as provided in the Uniform District Election Law, except that the commissioners elected at the first general district election shall classify themselves by lot so that the initial term of office of two commissioners shall be two years and the initial term of office of three commissioners shall be four years.

All vacancies occurring in the office of commissioner shall be filled by appointment by a majority of the remaining commissioners and as provided in Section 1780 of the Government Code.

At the first meeting of the board of port commissioners following the general district election, the board shall organize by electing one of its members chairperson. The members of the board of port commissioners shall annually elect a chairperson. A chairperson shall not succeed himself or herself in office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 111.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6241.

These appointments shall be made within thirty days after the formation of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6241.1.

Port districts in Ventura County shall be governed by a board of port commissioners consisting of five members appointed by the mayor of the municipal corporation in the district, with the approval of the city council.

The chairperson of the board shall be elected by the commissioners for a term of two years. An auditor shall be appointed by the board with the approval of the city council.

After a public hearing, the city council may remove commissioners from office during their term for cause by a vote of not less than five members of the city council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 626, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6242.

A vacancy on the board shall be filled by the body which appointed the commissioner whose office is vacated, and the new appointee shall hold his office for the unexpired term.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6243.

Each commissioner shall, within ten days after his appointment and before entering upon the discharge of the duties of his office, take and subscribe to an oath or affirmation before an officer authorized by law to administer oaths, that he will support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the State of California, and will faithfully discharge the duties of his office according to the best of his ability. The oaths or affirmations shall be filed in the office of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6244.

A person shall not be appointed a member of the board unless he is, at the time of his appointment, a taxpayer within the district and has resided within the district for at least one year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6245.

The term of office of each commissioner is four years from the time of his appointment, except that the chairman first appointed shall hold office for two years, and the remaining commissioners first appointed to the board shall classify themselves by lot, so that they hold office respectively for one, two, three, and four years.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6246.

The chairman is the presiding officer of the board and he shall vote on propositions passed upon by the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6247.

The first meeting of the board shall be held within ten days of the appointment of its chairman. The board may make its own rules of procedure and determine the place and time of its meeting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6248.

The board shall select one of its members vice chairman, who shall preside in the absence of the chairman.

The board shall provide for and select such officers, except the auditor, as it deems necessary to conduct the affairs of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6249.

The board may prescribe rules and regulations pertaining to the selection of officers and employees of the district, other than the auditor. It shall also fix the salary or wages of all officers and employees of the district. The term of each officer appointed by the board shall be during the pleasure of the board.

The board may adopt and carry into effect a contract or contracts of group insurance or a system of group annuities or both for the benefit of such of the officers and employees of the district as accept the same and who have authorized the board to make deductions from their compensation for the payment of a portion of the premium thereon. Contracts of group insurance or systems of group annuities which include benefits to dependents of officers and employees are contracts of group insurance or systems of group annuities for the benefit of officers and employees for the purpose of this section. The board may make such deductions and may pay the remainder of such premiums from any funds of the district not required to be devoted to a specific purpose. The board may pay such portion of the premiums thereon or attributable thereto as it determines to be advisable. The board may arrange or contract for a contract or contracts of group insurance or a system of group annuities or both with any public agency or any insurance company or agent authorized by or pursuant to law to transact such business within this State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 916.)
-------------------------------------------

6250.

A corporation may be selected as treasurer or the board may provide that the duties of the treasurer shall be performed by the county treasurer of the county in which the district is located, or by the city treasurer of the city within the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6251.

The commissioners shall serve without salary or compensation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6252.

The auditor of the district shall hold office during the pleasure of the board of election, and it shall fix his salary and require him to file a bond for the faithful performance of his duties in such amount as it may determine. The bonds shall be filed in the office of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6253.

The mayor of the city within the district, or the chairman of the board of supervisors of the county in which the district is located, may call meetings of the board of election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6254.

The fiscal year of any district shall begin on the first day of July of each year and shall end on the thirtieth day of June in the following year, unless otherwise fixed with the consent of the board of supervisors of the county in which the district is located.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6255.

The board shall annually file a report of the affairs and financial condition of the district for the preceding year. This report shall show the sources of all receipts and purposes of all disbursements during the year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Jurisdiction and Powers of the Board [6270. - 6276.]

6270.

The powers of a district established pursuant to this part shall be exercised by the board, by ordinance or resolution passed by a majority vote of the board. All ordinances shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation, printed or published in the county in which the district is situated, at least once before final passage.

Franchises and leases for a period of more than ten years shall not be valid, unless authorized by ordinance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6271.

A grant of a franchise or lease of property of the district shall not be made for a longer period than 50 years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

6272.

A district may destroy a record pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60200) of Division 1 of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

6273.

The district may itself, without letting contracts therefor, do work and make improvements. The work shall be done under the direction of its officers or employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

6275.

An officer of the district, and any of its employees, shall not be interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract or transaction with the district; or become surety for the performance of any contract made with or for the district, upon bonds given to the district.

An officer or employee of the district shall not receive any commission or thing of value, or derive any profit, benefit, or advantage, directly or indirectly, from or by reason of any dealings with or service for the district by himself or others, except as lawful compensation as such officer or employee.

The violation of the provisions of this section by an officer or employee works a forfeiture of his office or employment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6276.

(a) In lieu of the benefits afforded pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) and Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 6200) of the Labor Code, the district may agree to provide workers’ compensation benefits to its stevedore employees in amounts, and under such conditions, as would be payable to stevedore employees of private employers pursuant to the Longshoremen’s and Harbor Workers’ Compensation Act (33 U.S.C. 901, et seq.).

(b) Such an agreement shall be binding upon the parties only if it is in writing and signed by the employee and by a representative of the district. It shall acknowledge, in writing, that the benefits agreed upon are authorized by this section and are expressly in lieu of any benefits available under Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) and Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 6200) of the Labor Code.

(c) All claims for benefits against the district which are authorized by this section shall be determined pursuant to law and the rules and regulations of the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board. To the fullest extent possible, the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board shall attempt to apply the Longshoremen’s and Harbor Workers’ Compensation Act to employees covered by this section in the same manner as applicable to private employees.

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 11779 and 11870 of the Insurance Code or any other provision of law, the State Compensation Insurance Fund or any private insurer may provide insurance coverage for the benefits authorized by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 739.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. District Powers [6290. - 6311.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [6290. - 6311.]

6290.

A district created under this part is a public corporation created for municipal purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6291.

It has perpetual succession.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6292.

It may sue and be sued.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6293.

It may adopt a seal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6294.

It may take by grant, purchase, gift, devise or lease or otherwise acquire and hold and enjoy, and lease or dispose of, real and personal property of every kind, within or without the district, necessary to the full or convenient exercise of its powers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6295.

A district may acquire, purchase, takeover, construct, maintain, operate, develop, and regulate wharves, docks, warehouses, grain elevators, bunkering facilities, belt railroads, floating plants, lighterage, lands, towage facilities, and any and all other facilities, aids, or public personnel, incident to, or necessary for, the operation and development of ports, waterways, and the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

6296.

It may exercise the right of eminent domain to take any property necessary to carry out any of the objects or purposes of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 582.)
-------------------------------------------

6297.

It may incur indebtedness and issue bonds or other evidence of indebtedness for its purposes.

If any bonds issued for port improvement purposes by any part of a district prior to its creation are refunded, the refunding bonds are a lien only upon the lands upon which the original bonds were a lien at the time of the creation of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6298.

It may levy and collect or cause to be levied or collected taxes as in this part provided.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6299.
